Utah statutes.
72-4-212.   Pete Suazo Memorial Highway.
(1)  There is established the Pete Suazo Memorial Highway composed of the
existing Route 68 in Salt Lake City from 2100 South to 1700 North.
(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of
Transportation shall designate the portions of the highway identified in
Subsection (1) as the Pete Suazo Memorial Highway on future state highway
maps.
